src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_kualus_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kuálus: # ok, MLO 
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuálus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuállus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuállus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: kuálusân
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuálusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuálusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuállusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess:    kuálusin
    kuálus+N+Par:    kuálusid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: kuáluseh
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: kuálusij
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuálusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuálusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuálusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: [kuálusijguin, kuálusijgijn]
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuálusijttáá
